Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3604
Act; how construed.

The Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act (1991) shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 1999, LB 18, § 4.